Washington statutes.
RCW 19.138.130

Unprofessional conduct—Grounds—Registration—Revocation and reinstatement—Support order, noncompliance.

(1) In addition to the unprofessional conduct described in RCW 18.235.130, the director may take disciplinary action based on the following conduct, acts, or conditions if the applicant or registrant:

(a) Was previously the holder of a registration issued under this chapter, and the registration was revoked for cause and never reissued by the director, or the registration was suspended for cause and the terms of the suspension have not been fulfilled;

(b) Suffers a judgment in a civil action involving willful fraud, misrepresentation, or conversion;

(c) Has violated this chapter or failed to comply with a rule adopted by the director under this chapter; or

(d) Has failed to display the registration as provided in this chapter.

(2) If the seller of travel is found in violation of this chapter or in violation of the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW, by the entry of a judgment or by settlement of a claim, the director may revoke the registration of the seller of travel, and the director may reinstate the registration at the director's discretion.

(3) The director shall immediately suspend the license or certificate of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic upon the director's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

[ 2002 c 86 s 278; 1999 c 238 s 5; 1997 c 58 s 852; 1996 c 180 s 6; 1994 c 237 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.

Severability—1999 c 238: See note following RCW 19.138.030.

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.

Effective dates—Intent—1997 c 58: See notes following RCW 74.20A.320.

Effective date—1996 c 180: See note following RCW 19.138.021.